Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB611.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5347YC (5) 91 dg/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 554J.1 Definitions. 1 For purposes of this chapter: 2 1. âChatbotâ means any interactive computer service or 3 software application that does all of the following: 4 a. Produces new expressive content or responses not fully 5 predetermined by the developer or operator of the interactive 6 computer service or software application. 7 b. Accepts open-ended, natural-language, or multimodal user 8 input and produces adaptive or context-responsive output. 9 2. âChatbotâ does not include an interactive computer 10 service or a software application described by all of the 11 following: 12 a. The responses of the interactive computer service 13 or software application are limited to information only 14 contained within the interactive computer service or software 15 application, including user input, except for information 16 necessary to make the interactive computer service or software 17 application coherent. 18 b. The interactive computer service or software application 19 is only able to respond to topics in a narrow, specified field. 20 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 554J.2 Chatbots ââ required practices. 21 1. It shall be unlawful for a person to design, develop, or 22 make a chatbot available with the knowledge, or with reckless 23 disregard for the possibility, that the chatbot encourages, 24 promotes, or coerces a user to commit suicide, perform acts of 25 self-injury, or perform acts of physical or sexual violence on 26 humans or animals. 27 2. Each chatbot shall meet all of the following 28 requirements: 29 a. Clearly and conspicuously disclose that the chatbot 30 is a chatbot and not a human being at the beginning of each 31 conversation and at thirty-minute intervals. 32 b. Be programmed to prevent the chatbot from claiming to 33 be a human or respond deceptively when asked by a user if the 34 chatbot is a human. 35 -1- LSB 5347YC (5) 91 dg/jh 1/ 3 H.F. _____ c. Clearly and conspicuously disclose that the chatbot 1 does not provide medical, legal, financial, or psychological 2 services and that the user should consult a licensed 3 professional for such services at the beginning of each 4 conversation and at regular intervals. 5 d. Be programmed to prevent the chatbot from representing 6 that the chatbot is a licensed professional, including but not 7 limited to a therapist, physician, lawyer, financial advisor, 8 or other professional. 9 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 554J.3 Penalties. 10 1. A person found in violation of section 554J.2 shall 11 be fined not more than one hundred thousand dollars for each 12 violation. 13 2. a. The attorney general may bring a civil action to 14 enjoin a violation of or enforce compliance with this chapter 15 or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter. 16 b. In a case brought pursuant to this subsection, the 17 attorney general may seek civil penalties, restitution, or 18 other appropriate relief. 19 3. Penalties collected under this section shall be credited 20 to the general fund of the state and appropriated to the 21 attorney general for the purpose of performing duties under 22 this chapter. 23 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 554J.4 Rulemaking authority. 24 The attorney general shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 25 17A to implement this chapter. 26